src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # Meänkieli twolc file

!! This file documents the [Meänkieli twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) (the file governing gradation, gemination, vowel harmony and other morphophonological processes).

!! The first part of the file contains definitions, the second part contains rules.

!! # Declaring the alphabet, sets and definitions

!! ## Alphabet
!! This defines all symbols (letters, archiphonemes, triggers) to be used.

Alphabet


a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z å ä ö æ ø  !!= * @CODE@ = the letters
%^WG:0    !!= * @CODE@ = weak grade
%^E2I:0   !!= * @CODE@ = kiele- > kieli
%^HMETA:0 !!= * @CODE@ = vow metathesis for ill
%^HMET2:0 !!= * @CODE@ = vow metathesis for sauhnaan etc
%^AE:0    !!= * @CODE@ = a to e in otta- > otethaan
%^IDEL:0  !!= * @CODE@ = trigger to delete i
%>        !!= * @CODE@ = suffix boundary
i2:i      !!= * @CODE@ = plural of nouns
i3:i      !!= * @CODE@ = past tense of verbs
i4:i      !!= * @CODE@ = i in conditional of isi
i5:i      !!= * @CODE@ = superlative i of adjectives
i8:i      !!= * @CODE@ = past tense of verbs that drops in past antaa : anto
p2:p t2:t k2:k    !!= * @CODE@ = always p t k.
t3:t  	  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = t participating in gradation, but not in t:s
!m4:m      !!= * @CODE@ = mh to hm after short vowel
!h4:h      !!= * @CODE@ = mh to hm after short vowel
t4:t      !!= * @CODE@  goes to 0 in imartelee : imarella
%^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y !!= * @CODE@ vowel harmony archiphonemes
%^V:a   %^V:e   %^V:o   %^V:u   %^V:y   %^V:i   %^V:ä   %^V:ö !!= * @CODE@ = for vowel lenghtening
%^N:n !!= * @CODE@ for  participle -nut
;

!! ## Sets
!! Here we group the symbols in convenient sets.

Sets

Dummy          = %+ %^WG %^E2I %^HMETA %^HMET2 %^VDEL %^EDEL %^AE %^AO %^¤ %^IDEL ; !!= * @CODE@
DummyBorder    = Dummy %> ;                                          !!= * @CODE@
ArchiVowel     = %^A %^O %^U ;                                       !!= * @CODE@ 
SomeVowel      = %^V ;                                               !!= * @CODE@ 
NeutralVowel   = e i               i2 i3 i4 i5 E I ;                 !!= * @CODE@ 
FrontVowel     = e i y ä ö         ü  æ  ø     E I Y Ä Ö    Ü Æ Ø  ; !!= * @CODE@ 
BackVowel      =           a o u å                       A O U Å   ; !!= * @CODE@ 
RoundedVowel   =     y   ö   o u å                 Y   Ö   O U Å   ; !!= * @CODE@ 
UnroundedVowel = e i   ä   a                   E I   Ä   A         ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowelNotUY     = e i   ä ö a o   å ü  æ  ø     E I   Ä Ö A O Å Ü Æ Ø ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowelNotI      = e   y ä ö a o u å ü  æ  ø     E   Y Ä Ö A O Å Ü Æ Ø ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowelNotEI     =     y ä ö a o u å ü  æ  ø         Y Ä Ö A O U Ü Ä Ö ; !!= * @CODE@ 
Vow            = FrontVowel BackVowel ArchiVowel SomeVowel ;         !!= * @CODE@ 
ArchiCns       = %^N ;                                               !!= * @CODE@
LNRM           = l n r m ;                                           !!= * @CODE@
SurfaceCns     = b c d đ f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x z ;       !!= * @CODE@
Cns            = SurfaceCns ArchiCns p2 t2 t3 t4 k2 ;                !!= * @CODE@
Segment        = Vowel Cns ;                                         !!= * @CODE@
NonFront       = BackVowel ArchiVowel ArchiCns SomeVowel Cns NeutralVowel Dummy ;  !!= * @CODE@ 


!! ## Definitions
!! This defines strings used often in rules.

Definitions

WeakGrade = ([l|n|r]) (%^AE:) %^WG: ; !!≈ @CODE@


!! # Rules 
!! This chapter gives the rules themselves.

Rules 

!! ## Consonant rules


!! For the gradation rules, each consonant deletion or change is given its own rule. 
!! Thus, both *kk:k* and *k:0* are handled in the same **k:0* rule. This to avoid rule conflicts.
!! The  change rules (*k:g, k:j* etc.) are restricted by context (*k:g* only after *n*, etc.).


!! f rules

"f:0"
f:0 <=> Vow f _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;

!!€ soffa^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ sof000>haan



!! j rules
"j:0"
j:0 <=> Vow j _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;


!! **k rules**

"k:g"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:g <=> Vow n _ Vow: WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kenkä^WG>n
!!€ kengä0>n

"k:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:0 <=> [Vow|l|n|r] k _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! Quant Grad
                 o i: _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! pojan
         VowelNotUY   _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! maun 
	    [u|y]     _ VowelNotUY: WeakGrade ; ! tuen
                Vow [k|k2:] _ e: (%^WG:)  h     %> e       ; ! kkh > kh ääkkä : ääkhään
                Vow [k|k2:] _ Vow: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; ! kkh > kh ääkkä : ääkhään
            Vow [l|r] _ VowelNotEI  WeakGrade ;
              Vow h k _ Vow         WeakGrade ;
          [Vow - e] h _ Vow         WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ takki^WG>n
!!€ tak0i0>n
!!€ johke^WG
!!€ joh0e0
!!€ ääkkä^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ ääk000>hään


"k:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:j <=> Vow [l|r] _ [:i|:e]  WeakGrade ;   ! syljen
        Vow [l|r] _ Vow:0  WeakGrade %> :i ; ! syljin,
	e h _ [e:|i:] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ sylke^WG>n
!!€ sylje0>n
!!€ kehke^WG>t^A
!!€ kehje0>tä


"k:v"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:v <=> [u|y] _ [y|u] WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ suku^WG>n
!!€ suvu0>n



!! l rules
"l:0"
l:0 <=> Vow l _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;
        Vow (Vow:) (%^WG:) (%>) :Vow (%>) l _ [%^A:|e] ; !för att få ämmäkölle MEN ämmäköilä, ämmäköile etc, hopeile
!       :Vow :Vow (%^WG:) %> l _ [%^A:|e] [.#.|#]; ! hopeale


!! m rules
"m:0"
m:0 <=> Vow m _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;


!! n rules
"n:0"
n:0 <=> Vow n _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;





!! **p rules**

"p:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
p:0 <=> [Vow|l|m|r] p _ Vow: WeakGrade ; ! tärppä : tärpän
!                Vow p _ e: h %> e ; ! Inkluder när vi ser vad.
        [Vow|l|m|r] p _ Vow: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;  ! tärppä : tärphään

!! **Tests:**

!!€ appi^WG
!!€ ap0i0

"p:v"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
p:v <=> Vow   _ Vow:  WeakGrade ;
        Vow r _ Vow WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ papu^WG>n
!!€ pavu0>n
!!€ varpa^WGs
!!€ varva0s

"p:m"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
p:m <=> Vow m _ Vow: WeakGrade ;


!! r rules
"r:0"
r:0 <=> Vow r _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;



!! s rules
"s:0"
s:0 <=> Vow s _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;


!! t rules

"t:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
t:0 <=> Vow ([l|n|r]) t _ Vow:+ [WeakGrade | %^HMET2: |%^HMETA:] ; ! new try: all tt give t
        [i|u]              _  [ä|a]    WeakGrade ; ! pitä- : piän, haitata; huutaa>huua
        [a|e|y|ä|ö] h   _ Vow:       WeakGrade (%>) i3: ; ! för att få lähen, lähin
        VowelNotI (h)   _ Vow:       WeakGrade (%>) [Cns:|%^E2I:0] ; ! katu : kaun        
        [ä|e]            _  i        WeakGrade ; !
                      t _ Vow: %^HMETA: %> h [i i|%^V: %^V:|%^V: i] ;
                  Vow _ [t|t2:] Vow: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !mettä>methään

!		  :e %> _ %^A: ; ! hanhea -- rather two classes
!        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ [l|n|r] _ Vow:+ WeakGrade ; ! imarela : imartelen
!       Vow:+ Cns:+ i t     _ Vow:+     WeakGrade ; ! esitellä
!       VowelNotI (h)      _ [a|e|o|u] WeakGrade ; ! katu : kaun
!       VowelNotI        t _ e: h %> e           ;
!      [VowelNotI|l|n|r] t _ Vow:      WeakGrade ; ! motti Quant Grad. Note h!

!! **Tests:**

!!€ motti^WG
!!€ mot0i0
!!€ tehta^WGs
!!€ teh0a0s
!!€ pitä^WG>t
!!€ pi0ä0>t
!!€ tytär^WG
!!€ ty0är0

"t4:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** where *t4* is *t* in *rt* that shall not become *rr* 
t4:0 <=> Vow:+ [l|n|r] _ Vow:+ WeakGrade ;
         Vow   t       _ Vow:  [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ imart4el^WG>l^A
!!€ imar0el0>la

"t:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
t:j <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:* i _ i     WeakGrade ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:* i _ [o|u] WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ hoito^WG>n
!!€ hoijo0>n

"t:l"  
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** for lt:ll
t:l <=> Vow:+ l (%>) _ :Vow WeakGrade [s|%> [\i2:i|\i3:i]|.#.] ; ! kulta : kullan

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kulta^WG>n
!!€ kulla0>n

"t:n" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** for nt:nn 
t:n <=> (Cns:*) Vow:+  n (%>) _ :Vow WeakGrade [s|%>|#] ; ! [s|%> [\i2:i|\i3:i]|.#.] ; ! kanta : kannan

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kanta^WG>n
!!€ kanna0>n

"t:r" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** for rt:rr 
t:r <=>  Vow:+ r _ :Vow WeakGrade [s|%> [\i2:i|i3:i]|.#.] ; ! kerta : kerran

!! **Tests:**

!!€ jukertel^WG>l^A
!!€ jukerrel0>la


"t:s"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
t:s <=> [Vow - i] ([l|n|r]) _ e:0 (WeakGrade) %> [i2:|i3:] ;
        [Vow - i] ([l|n|r]) _ e: %^E2I: .#. ;
! Rest of rule from fkv:
        Vow n  _        e:0                    %> i2: [.#.|%> Cns] ; ! fkv
 Vow ([n|l|r]) _ (:s)   e:   (%^WG:) %^E2I: ; ! fkv: uusine, vesi: vete^E2I:vesi, vete^WG>n:vede0>n, vete^WG>i2>ll^A:vesillä
 Vow           _ (:s)   e:0                    %> i2: %> [Cns|%^V:|%^A:] ; ! [vuosiksi, etc.|vuossii(n)|uusia] ! uusine
 Vow [n|l|r]   _       e:0  (%^WG:0)   %^E2I:  %> i2: ; ! hirsiksi, hirsi (pl - gen par) 
 Vow ([n|l|r]) _        e:0 (%^AO:0) [%^HMETA:0| %^HMET2:0] %> h :i ;    ! jok uushiin
        [i|u|y|ö] [e|u|y] _ (:s) Vow: (%^AO:0) (%^WG:0) %> i3: ;   ! huuttaat:huusi, löyttäät:löysi (ei sousi, nousi tai hoisi) 
 Vow  n        _     Vow:0  [Dummy:* - %^WG:0] %> i3: ;
 Vow [n|l|r]   _ (:s) Vow:0 (%^WG:0)  (%^AO:0) %> i3: ;
             i _ k: 0: ä: %> i5:i  ; ! superlatiivi pitkä/pissiin

!! **Tests:**

!!€ vete^E2I
!!€ vesi0
!!€ vere^E2I
!!€ veri0
!!€ varte^E2I
!!€ varsi0



!! v rules
"v:0"
v:0 <=> Vow v _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;




!! ### Gemination rules

!! The gemination rules **insert** the geminated consonant (thus *0:h* if *h* to the left). 
!! There is one subrule for each vowel context, in order to avoid confilcts.

"Gemination 0:h"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:h <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow (Vow) h _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i \:i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow h _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
                  Vow Vow   _ [l|m|n|r|v] e: %^WG: %> h: e e : ; ! huo0ne^WG>een : huohne0>een !CHECK needed?
        !Rules for metathesis type two, position 1 in Kuoppa (efter två tonande Cns)
                  Vow   l   _ [j|  m|n|r|v] Vow: %^HMET2: ; ! ilhmaa lm, lv, 
                  Vow   r   _ [j|  m|n  |v] Vow: %^HMET2: ; ! varhmaan, Norhjaan
                  Vow   n   _ l          Vow: %^HMET2: ; ! 
                  Vow   m   _ n          Vow: %^HMET2: ; !        
        !Rules for metathesis type two, position 2 in Kuoppa/Mantila (efter syll m huvudbetoning & Vow Vow) (ingår i P3)
                ![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Vow _ [l|m|n|r|v] Vow: %^HMET2: %> h: ; ! puohleen, sauhnaan
                ![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow VowNotI _ j Vow: %^HMET2: %> h: ; ! luohjaan
        !Rules for methatesis type two, position 3 in Kuoppa (efter syll utan huvudbetoning & Vow Vow)
                Vow (%>) Vow  _ [l|m|n|r|v] (Vow:)  %^HMET2: (%>) h: ; !aikoihnaan, saarnaahmaan !HÄR in h
                Vow (%>) VowNotI _ j Vow: %^HMET2: (%>) h: ; ! aluohjaan
        !!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4-6 (pe-se/mhaan OCH an-tah/maan öppen/sluten betonad + kort obetonad)
                Vow+ Cns+ (Cns) Vow (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) %^HMET2: (%>)  h: :Vow :Vow ; !mostly nouns; elämhään/elähmään 
                Vow+ Cns+ Vow (%>) %^HMET2: (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] h: Vow Vow ;!mostly verbs; tulehmaan, neuvottelehmaan
        !!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4 (efter kort bet öppen syll + kort sonorantsluten stavelse; pe-sem-hään)
                ![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Cns Vow _ [l|m|n|r|v] (Vow:) %^HMET2: %>  h: :Vow :Vow ; !nouns; elämhään/elähmään UTAN antahmaan
                ![.#.|#] (Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns) (Cns) Vow Cns Vow (%>) %^HMET2: (%>) _ [l|m|n|r|v] h: Vow Vow ;!verbs; tulehmaan, neuvottelehmaan, valehtelehmaan
                
